Massachusetts, session 194th, S3153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 129 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 48 the following section:-
Section 49. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
“Fur,” any animal skin or part thereof with hair, fleece, or fur fibers attached thereto,
either in its raw or processed state.
“Fur product,” any article of clothing or covering for any part of the body, or any fashion
accessory, including but not limited to handbags, shoes, slippers, hats, earmuffs, scarves, shawls,
gloves, jewelry, keychains, toys or trinkets, and home accessories and décor, that is made in
whole or part of fur. “Fur product” shall not include any of the following:
(1) An animal skin or part thereof that is to be converted into leather, or which in
processing will have the hair, fleece, or fur fiber completely removed;
of 3

(2) Animal hair, fleece, or fur fibers that are not attached to skin, including, but not
limited to, fishing lures; or
(3) Fur, wool, or other fibers sourced exclusively from any member of the Bovidae,
Camelidae, Equidae, Suidae, or Cervidae taxonomic family.
“Fur farm,” any operation in which animals, including but not limited to mink, fox,
raccoon dog or chinchilla, are owned, controlled, raised, bred, propagated, or kept for the value
of their fur.
“Person,” any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, limited liability
company, corporation, estate, trust, receiver, or syndicate.
“Ultimate consumer,” an individual who buys a fur product for their own use, or for the
use of another, but not for resale or trade.
“Used fur product,” a fur product that has been worn or used by an ultimate consumer.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not sell, offer for sale,
display for sale, trade, or otherwise distribute for monetary or nonmonetary consideration, a fur
product in Massachusetts if any of the fur contained in the fur product was sourced from an
animal that was raised, maintained, kept, or housed for all or part of its life on a fur farm. The
sale of a fur product occurs in Massachusetts if the buyer takes physical possession of the fur
product in Massachusetts or the seller is located in Massachusetts.
(c) This section shall not apply to the sale, offer for sale, display for sale, trade, or
distribution of: (i) a used fur product; (ii) a fur product used for religious purposes; or (iii) a fur
product used in an activity expressly authorized by federal law.
of 3

(d) A person who violates this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than
$5,000 per violation. Each fur product that constitutes a violation of this chapter shall be treated
as a separate violation.
(e) The attorney general shall promulgate regulations for the implementation and
enforcement of this chapter. The attorney general may seek injunctive relief to prevent violations
of this chapter.
SECTION 2. Not later than 6 months after the passage of this act, the attorney general
shall promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect 1 year after passage.
of 3